Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Permanent school fund supplemental aid. new text end new text begin (a) For permanent school fund supplemental aid to American Indian schools as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.73: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 40,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 40,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027 only, the permanent school fund supplemental aid for an American Indian school equals the product of: new text end new text begin (1) the amount appropriated under paragraph (a) for that fiscal year; and new text end new text begin (2) the ratio of (i) the average daily membership served of the American Indian school in the prior fiscal year, to (ii) the total average daily membership served of all American Indian schools in the state in the prior fiscal year. new text end new text begin (c) Aid under this subdivision must be paid 100 percent in the current year on a schedule determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end